test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_CW_jooweshk_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - CW - jooweshk :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     jooweshk+NA: jooweshk
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+jooweshk+NA: njooweshk
     2+jooweshk+NA: gjooweshk
     X+jooweshk+NA: jooweshk
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     jooweshk+NA+Con: jooweshkoonh
     jooweshk+NA+Dim: jooweshkoons
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     jooweshk+NA+Pej: jooweshkosh
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     jooweshk+NA+Prt: jooweshkba
     jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl: jooweshkdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     jooweshk+NA+4: jooweshkon
     jooweshk+NA+Loc: jooweshkong
     jooweshk+NA+Pl: jooweshkog
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con: njooweshkoonh
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim: njooweshkoons
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con: gjooweshkoonh
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim: gjooweshkoons
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con: jooweshkoonh
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim: jooweshkoons
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos: njooweshkom
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos: gjooweshkom
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos: jooweshkom
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej: njooweshkosh
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej: gjooweshkosh
     X+jooweshk+NA+Pej: jooweshkosh
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl: njooweshknaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl: gjooweshknaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+2+Pl: gjooweshkwaa
     3+jooweshk+NA+3+4: jooweshkni
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+Prt: njooweshkba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl: njooweshkdig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Prt: gjooweshkba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkdig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Prt: jooweshkba
     X+jooweshk+NA+Voc+Pl: jooweshkdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+4: njooweshkon
     1+jooweshk+NA+Loc: njooweshkong
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pl: njooweshkog
     2+jooweshk+NA+4: gjooweshkon
     2+jooweshk+NA+Loc: gjooweshkong
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pl: gjooweshkog
     3+jooweshk+NA+4: jooweshkon
     3+jooweshk+NA+Loc: jooweshkong
     X+jooweshk+NA+4: jooweshkon
     X+jooweshk+NA+Loc: jooweshkong
     X+jooweshk+NA+Pl: jooweshkog
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej: jooweshkoonyish
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej: jooweshkoonsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt: jooweshkoonyba
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonydig
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt: jooweshkoonsba
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     jooweshk+NA+Con+4: jooweshkoonyin
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc: jooweshkoonying
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl: jooweshkoonyig
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+4: jooweshkoonsan
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc: jooweshkoonsing
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl: jooweshkoonsag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt: jooweshkshiba
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+4: jooweshkshan
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc: jooweshkshing
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl: jooweshkshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+4: jooweshkbaniin
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc: jooweshkbaniing
     jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl: jooweshkbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos: njooweshkoonyim
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos: njooweshkoonsim
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos: gjooweshkoonyim
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos: gjooweshkoonsim
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos: jooweshkoonyim
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos: jooweshkoonsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej: njooweshkoonyish
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej: njooweshkoonsish
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej: gjooweshkoonyish
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej: gjooweshkoonsish
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej: jooweshkoonyish
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej: jooweshkoonsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl: njooweshkoonynaa
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl: njooweshkoonsnaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+1+Pl: gjooweshkoonynaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+2+Pl: gjooweshkoonywaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+1+Pl: gjooweshkoonsnaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+2+Pl: gjooweshkoonswaa
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+3+4: jooweshkoonyni
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+3+4: jooweshkoonsni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt: njooweshkoonyba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonydig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt: njooweshkoonsba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: njooweshkoonsdig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt: gjooweshkoonyba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonydig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt: gjooweshkoonsba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkoonsdig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt: jooweshkoonyba
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonydig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt: jooweshkoonsba
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonsdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+4: njooweshkoonyin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc: njooweshkoonying
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl: njooweshkoonyig
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+4: njooweshkoonsan
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc: njooweshkoonsing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl: njooweshkoonsag
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+4: gjooweshkoonyin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc: gjooweshkoonying
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl: gjooweshkoonyig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+4: gjooweshkoonsan
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc: gjooweshkoonsing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl: gjooweshkoonsag
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+4: jooweshkoonyin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc: jooweshkoonying
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+4: jooweshkoonsan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc: jooweshkoonsing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+4: jooweshkoonyin
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Loc: jooweshkoonying
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+Pl: jooweshkoonyig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+4: jooweshkoonsan
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Loc: jooweshkoonsing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pl: jooweshkoonsag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej: njooweshkmish
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej: gjooweshkmish
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pej: jooweshkmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: njooweshkminaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+1+Pl: gjooweshkminaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+2+Pl: gjooweshkmiwaa
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+3+4: jooweshkmini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt: njooweshkmiba
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: njooweshkmidig
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt: gjooweshkmiba
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkmidig
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Prt: jooweshkmiba
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Voc+Pl: jooweshkmidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+4: njooweshkman
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Loc: njooweshkming
     1+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pl: njooweshkmag
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+4: gjooweshkman
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Loc: gjooweshkming
     2+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pl: gjooweshkmag
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+4: jooweshkman
     3+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Loc: jooweshkming
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+4: jooweshkman
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Loc: jooweshkming
     X+jooweshk+NA+ThmPos+Pl: jooweshkmag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl: njooweshkshinaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+1+Pl: gjooweshkshinaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+2+Pl: gjooweshkshiwaa
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+3+4: jooweshkshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt: njooweshkshiba
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: njooweshkshidig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt: gjooweshkshiba
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkshidig
     X+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt: jooweshkshiba
     X+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+4: njooweshkshan
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc: njooweshkshing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl: njooweshkshag
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+4: gjooweshkshan
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc: gjooweshkshing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl: gjooweshkshag
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+4: jooweshkshan
     3+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc: jooweshkshing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Pej+4: jooweshkshan
     X+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Loc: jooweshkshing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Pej+Pl: jooweshkshag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+Prt: njooweshknaanba
     1+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: njooweshknaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+Prt: gjooweshknaanba
     2+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshknaandig
     2+jooweshk+NA+2+Pl+Prt: gjooweshkwaaba
     2+jooweshk+NA+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gjooweshkwaadig
     3+jooweshk+NA+3+4+Prt: jooweshkniwba
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+4: njooweshknaanin
     1+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+Loc: njooweshknaaning
     1+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+Pl: njooweshknaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+4: gjooweshknaanin
     2+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+Loc: gjooweshknaaning
     2+jooweshk+NA+1+Pl+Pl: gjooweshknaanig
     2+jooweshk+NA+2+Pl+4: gjooweshkwaan
     2+jooweshk+NA+2+Pl+Loc: gjooweshkwaang
     2+jooweshk+NA+2+Pl+Pl: gjooweshkwaag
     3+jooweshk+NA+2+Pl+4: jooweshkwaan
     3+jooweshk+NA+2+Pl+Loc: jooweshkwaang
     3+jooweshk+NA+3+4+4: jooweshkniwan
     3+jooweshk+NA+3+4+Loc: jooweshkniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+jooweshk+NA+Prt+4: njooweshkbaniin
     1+jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc: njooweshkbaniing
     1+jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl: njooweshkbaniig
     2+jooweshk+NA+Prt+4: gjooweshkbaniin
     2+jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc: gjooweshkbaniing
     2+jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl: gjooweshkbaniig
     3+jooweshk+NA+Prt+4: jooweshkbaniin
     3+jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc: jooweshkbaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Prt+4: jooweshkbaniin
     X+jooweshk+NA+Prt+Loc: jooweshkbaniing
     X+jooweshk+NA+Prt+Pl: jooweshkbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Prt: jooweshkoonyshiba
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonyshidig
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Prt: jooweshkoonsshiba
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc+Pl: jooweshkoonsshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+4: jooweshkoonyshan
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Loc: jooweshkoonyshing
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Pej+Pl: jooweshkoonyshag
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+4: jooweshkoonsshan
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc: jooweshkoonsshing
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Pej+Pl: jooweshkoonsshag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6, 7
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+4: jooweshkoonybaniin
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonybaniing
     jooweshk+NA+Con+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonybaniig
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+4: jooweshkoonsbaniin
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Loc: jooweshkoonsbaniing
     jooweshk+NA+Dim+Prt+Pl: jooweshkoonsbaniig
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6, 7
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+4: jooweshkshibniin
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Loc: jooweshkshibniing
     jooweshk+NA+Pej+Prt+Pl: jooweshkshibniig
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: njooweshkoonymish
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: njooweshkoonsmish
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: gjooweshkoonymish
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: gjooweshkoonsmish
     X+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej: jooweshkoonymish
     X+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej: jooweshkoonsmish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5
     1+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: njooweshkoonyminaa
     1+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: njooweshkoonsminaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl: gjooweshkoonyminaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl: gjooweshkoonymiwaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl: gjooweshkoonsminaa
     2+jooweshk+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl: gjooweshkoonsmiwaa
